Florida, session 2026, HB1559.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The intent of this act is to:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1559-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1559 2026
(1) Protect the historic and cultural value of the Coconut
Grove Playhouse, Miami-Dade County.
(2) Enforce accountability for the state-owned Coconut
Grove Playhouse by reassigning stewardship away from Miami-Dade
County through a transfer of the property interest to the Town
of Bay Harbor Islands, Miami-Dade County, a municipality that is
capable of honoring both the public trust and historic
preservation covenants.
Section 2. (1) On July 1, 2026, Miami-Dade County shall
transfer the existing property interest in the Coconut Grove
Playhouse, Miami-Dade County, to the Town of Bay Harbor Islands,
Miami-Dade County, for the purposes of historic preservation,
public use, and cultural benefit.
(2)(a) Upon receiving the existing property interest in
the Coconut Grove Playhouse, the Town of Bay Harbor Islands
shall consult with the City of Miami, the Department of
Environmental Protection, and the Division of Historical
Resources of the Department of State on feasible and prudent
alternatives to the demolition or alteration of the playhouse,
as required under s. 267.061(2)(b), Florida Statutes, and on
every renovation it plans to perform to protect the historic and
cultural value of the property.
(b) The Town of Bay Harbor Islands shall, to the maximum
extent practicable, use public funds and other funds reserved
for the playhouse to:
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1559-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1559 2026
1. Comply with the directives of the Department of
Environmental Protection, including:
a. Taking preservation actions as a condition of state
ownership and oversight.
b. Preserving the historic facade, roofline, and
architectural integrity of the playhouse.
c. Fulfilling obligations under the original state deed
covenants.
2. Fulfill its contract and fiduciary duty, including
complying with all restrictive covenants requiring preservation
and building stabilization for historic, cultural, and public
use.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1559-00